Arkansas, session 2025, HB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Fertility Treatment Rights

20-9-1601. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Fertility treatment" means:
(A) Preservation of human oocytes, sperm, or embryos for
later reproductive use;
(B) Artificial insemination, including intravaginal
insemination, intracervical insemination, and intrauterine insemination;
(C) Assisted reproductive technology, including in vitro
fertilization and other treatments or procedures in which reproductive
genetic material, such as oocytes, sperm, fertilized eggs, and embryos are
handled, when clinically appropriate;
*JMB039*
01-16-2025 15:33:07 JMB039

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1013
(D) Genetic testing of embryos;
(E) Medications prescribed or obtained over-the-counter,
as indicated for fertility;
(F) Gamete donation; and
(G) Such other information, referrals, treatments,
procedures, medications, laboratory testing, technologies, and services
relating to fertility as deemed appropriate by the Secretary of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) "Healthcare provider" means an entity or individual that:
(A) Is engaged or seeks to engage in the delivery of
fertility treatment, including through evidence-based information,
counseling, referrals, or items and services relating to, aiding in, or
providing fertility treatment; and
(B) Is licensed, certified, permitted, or otherwise
authorized by the state to engage in the delivery of services relating to,
aiding in, or providing fertility treatment;
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an insurance company,
insurance service, or insurance organization, including a health maintenance
organization, which is licensed to engage in the business of insurance in
this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include a group health
plan as defined by 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-91, as existing on January 1, 2025;
(4) "Manufacturer" means manufacturer of a drug or device
approved, cleared, authorized, or licensed under the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, as existing on January 1, 2025, or 42 U.S.C. § 262, as existing
on January 1, 2025, or otherwise legally marketed; and
(5) “Widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of
care” means medical services, procedures, and practices that are in
accordance with the guidelines of the American Society for Reproductive
Medicine.

20-9-1602. Individual fertility treatment rights.
An individual has a right without prohibition, limitation,
interference, or impediment to:
(1) Receive fertility treatment from a healthcare provider, in
accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care;
01-16-2025 15:33:07 JMB039

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1013
(2) Continue or complete an ongoing fertility treatment
previously initiated by a healthcare provider, in accordance with widely
accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care;
(3) Make decisions and arrangements regarding the donation,
testing, use, storage, or disposition of reproductive genetic material, such
as oocytes, sperm, fertilized eggs, and embryos; and
(4) Establish contractual agreements with a healthcare provider
relating to the healthcare provider’s services in handling, testing, storing,
shipping, and disposing of the individual’s reproductive genetic material in
accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.

20-9-1603. Healthcare provider rights.
A healthcare provider has a right without prohibition, limitation,
interference, or impediment to:
(1) Provide or assist with fertility treatment provided in
accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care;
(2) Continue, complete, or assist with fertility treatment that
was lawful when commenced and is provided in accordance with widely accepted
and evidence-based medical standards of care;
(3) Provide for or assist with the testing, use, storage, or
disposition of reproductive genetic material, such as oocytes, sperm,
fertilized eggs, and embryos, in accordance with widely accepted and
evidence-based medical standards of care; and
(4) Establish contractual agreements with individuals or
manufacturers relating to the healthcare provider’s services in handling,
testing, storing, shipping, and disposing of an individual’s reproductive
genetic material.

20-9-1604. Healthcare insurer rights.
A healthcare insurer has a right without prohibition, limitation,
interference, or impediment to cover fertility treatment provided in
accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.

20-9-1605. Manufacturer rights
A manufacturer has a right without prohibition, limitation,
interference, or impediment to manufacture, import, market, sell, and
01-16-2025 15:33:07 JMB039

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1013
distribute a drug or device legally marketed and intended for use in
providing fertility treatment, including the storage or transport of oocytes,
gametes, fertilized eggs, and embryos.

20-9-1606. Regulation of medicine.
The enforcement of state laws regarding medical facilities or
healthcare providers does not constitute a violation of this subchapter if:
(1) The state laws or rules are in accordance with widely
accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care for providing fertility
treatment; and
(2) The safety or health objective cannot be advanced by a
different means that does not prohibit, limit, interfere with, or impede the
rights described in this subchapter.

20-9-1607. Enforcement.
(a) An individual or entity adversely affected by an alleged violation
of this subchapter may commence a civil action against an individual,
employee, official, agency head, contractor, organization, or instrumentality
that enacts, implements, or enforces a limitation or requirement that
prohibits, limits, interferes with, or impedes the rights of an individual, a
healthcare provider, a healthcare insurer, or a manufacturer under this
subchapter.
(b) A healthcare provider may commence a civil action for relief on
behalf of the healthcare provider, the healthcare provider’s staff, or the
healthcare provider’s patients who are or may be adversely affected by an
alleged violation of this subchapter.
(c) In any action under this subchapter, the court may award
appropriate equitable relief, including temporary, preliminary, or permanent
injunctive relief.
(d)(1) In any action under this subchapter, the court shall award
costs of litigation, as well as reasonable attorney’s fees, to any prevailing
plaintiff.
(2) A plaintiff is not liable to a defendant for costs or
attorney’s fees in any non-frivolous action under this subchapter unless the
costs or attorney’s fees are imposed by the court as part of sanctions for
violations committed during the discovery process.
01-16-2025 15:33:07 JMB039

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1013

/s/Hudson


































01-16-2025 15:33:07 JMB039